Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 1 Judicial Appointment
17-4-118. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 1, §§17-4-101 —17-4-112,17-4-114 —17-4-118 (Acts 1971, ch. 198, §§ 1-12, 14-16; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch 740, § 6; Acts 1973, ch. 265, §§ 1-7; 1974, ch. 433, § 1; 1976, ch. 712, § 1; 1982, ch. 590, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 17-701 — 17-712, 17-714 — 17-716, modified; Acts 1986, ch. 624, §§ 1-4; 1989, ch. 431, § 1; 1993, ch. 66, §§ 37, 38; 1993, ch. 196, §§ 6, 7; 1994, ch. 942, §§ 3-14, 16-20; 1999, ch. 315, §§ 2-10; 2001, ch. 459, §§ 3-8), concerning judicial selection, was repealed by Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 1, effective July 1, 2009. For provisions concerning judicial nomination, see this part.

Former §17-4-118 concerned trial court judges, appointments, expiration of terms, and elections.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-119. [Repealed.]

Acts 2009, ch. 517, § 3; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-4-119 concerned transfer of rules, procedures, records, reports, functions and duties to successor entities.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

17-4-120. [Repealed.]

Acts 2012, ch. 853, § 3; repealed by Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 15, effective January 28, 2016.

Compiler's Notes. Former §17-4-120 concerned continuance or postponement of proceedings if member of judicial nominating commission absent.

For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.